Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2021
Inheritance tax; appraisement; county judge as appraiser.

Instead of appointing an appraiser, the county judge may by order fix a day and give notice to all interested parties and at such time appraise the property at the fair market value of the same.

Laws 1915, c. 113, § 1, p. 262;

C.S.1922, § 6163;

C.S.1929, § 77-2211;

R.S.1943, § 77-2021.

County court is not bound by report made by appraiser but may take further evidence and enter order determining tax. County of Keith v. Triska, 168 Neb. 1, 95 N.W.2d 350 (1959).

County court can fix values without appointing special appraisers. State ex rel. Nebraska State Bar Assn. v. Richards, 165 Neb. 80, 84 N.W.2d 136 (1957).

County judge may act as appraiser. County of Holt v. Gallagher, 156 Neb. 457, 56 N.W.2d 621 (1953).